src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2
: COPULA-NONPAST-20 ;
LEXICON SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12
 SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG1 ;
 SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;

LEXICON PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL1
: COPULA-NONPAST-40 ;
LEXICON PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2
: COPULA-NONPAST-50 ;
LEXICON PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12
 PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL1 ;
 PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;

!LEXICON NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-FROM-SG-NOM-INDEF-STEM
!SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;
!PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;

LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-10
@U.CONJ-PX.1Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.1Ø@%>%{АЯ%}н  NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-20
@U.CONJ-PX.2Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.2Ø@%>%{АЯ%}т NounEnd_K ;

!LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-30
!@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@%>%{ИЫЙ%} NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-40
@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма NounEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl1+Orth/Colloq:@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}м NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-50
@U.CONJ-PX.5Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.5Ø@%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}да NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-NONPAST-60
@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@%>%{Х%}т NounEnd_K ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@%>%{ИЫЙ%}хть NounEnd_K ;
!VERB-ZERO!-10...-60 CHECKME 2023_04


LEXICON COPULA-PRT-10
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.1Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.1Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}лень  NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-PRT-20
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.2Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.2Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}леть NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-PRT-30
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}ль NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-PRT-40
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.4Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}леме NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-PRT-50
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.5Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.5Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}леде NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON COPULA-PRT-60
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3:@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.CONJ-PX.3Ø@%>%{ЕОØ%}льхть NounEnd_K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
